en: Flower preserves, flower jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras de flores, Mermeladas de pétalos de flores
fr: Confits de fleurs, confitures de fleurs
hr: Cvjetne konzerve
hu: Virág lekvárok
nl: Bloemenjams

en: Rose petal preserves, rose petal jams, Rose jams
bg: Конфитюр от рози, Сладко от рози
es: Mermeladas y confituras de pétalos de rosas, Mermeladas y confituras de rosas, Mermeladas de pétalos de rosas, Mermeladas de rosas, Confituras de pétalos de rosas, Confituras de rosas
fr: Confits de roses, Confiture de roses, Confitures de roses
hr: Konzerve od ružinih latica
hu: Rózsa lekvár
nl: Rozeblaadjesjams

en: Ginger preserves
fr: Tartinades de gingembre

en: Ginger jams
fr: Confitures de gingembre

en: Fruit and vegetable preserves
bg: Конфитюри и мармалади
de: Konfitüren und Marmeladen
es: Preparaciones a base de frutas y verduras
fi: Hedelmäsäilykkeet
fr: Confitures et marmelades
he: שימורי פרות וירקות, שימורי פירות וירקות
hr: Konzervirano voće i povrće
hu: Gyümölcskonzervek
nl: Confituren en marmelades
pl: Przetwory owocowe
th: ผลไม้แปรรูป
zh: 水果及蔬菜加工品

en: Vegetable preserves
es: Preparaciones a base de verduras

en: Fruit preserves
ca: Conserves de fruita
es: Preparaciones a base de frutas
it: Conserve di frutta
pt: Conservas de fruta

en: Fruit preserves with chocolate
fr: Confitures au chocolat

en: Jams
bg: Конфитюри, Конфитюр
ca: Melmelades
cs: Džemem
da: Syltetøj, Marmelade
de: Konfitüren, Konfitüre
el: μαρμελάδα
es: Confitura
et: Džemm
fi: hillot, Hillo
fr: Confitures, Confiture
he: ריבות
hr: džemovi, džem
hu: Dzsemek, Lekvárok, dzsem
it: Confetture e marmellate, Confetture, Confettura
ja: ジャム
lt: Džemas
lv: Džems
mt: Ġamm
nl: Jams, Confituren, Jam, confituur
pl: Dżemy, konfitury, powidła, Dżem
pt: Doces, Doce
ro: Gemul
ru: Варенья
sk: Džem
sl: Džem
sv: Sylter, sylt
th: แยม
tr: Reçel
zh: 果酱

en: Fruit jams
da: Frugtsyltetøj
fr: Confitures de fruits
sv: Fruktsylter

en: Vegetable jams
da: Grøntsagssyltetøj
sv: Grönsakssylter

en: Extra jams, extra fruit jams, extra jam, extra fruit jam
bg: Конфитюр екстра качество
cs: Džemem výběrovým, Extra Džemem
da: Marmelade ekstra
de: Konfitüre extra
el: μαρμελάδα έξτρα
es: Confitura extra
et: Ekstra džemm
fi: Erikoishillo
fr: confitures extra, confiture extra
hr: Ekstra džemovi, Ekstra džem
hu: extradzsem
it: Confettura extra
lt: Aukščiausios rūšies džemas
lv: Augstākā labuma džems
mt: Ġamm extra tal-frott
nl: Extra jam, extra confituur
pl: Dżem ekstra
pt: Doce extra
ro: Gemul de calitate superioară
sk: Extra džem
sl: Ekstra džem
sv: Extra sylter, Extra sylt

en: Artisan jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras artesanales, Mermeladas artesanales, Confituras artesanales
fr: Confitures artisanales
hr: Obrtnički džemovi
hu: Kézműves lekvárok
it: Confetture e marmellate artigianali
nl: Ambachtelijke jams

en: Dietary jams
es: Mermeladas y confituras dietéticas
fr: Confitures diététiques
hr: Dijetetski džemovi
hu: Diétás lekvárok
it: Confetture e marmellate dietetiche
nl: Dieetjams

en: Low sugar fruit jam, Reduced sugar fruit jam, Light jams
de: Fruchtmarmelade mit niedrigem Zuckergehalt, Fruchtmarmelade mit reduziertem Zuckergehalt, leichte Marmelade
es: Mermeladas y confituras ligeras, Mermeladas y confituras light
fi: kevythillot
fr: Confiture de fruits allégée en sucres, Confitures allégées
hr: Voćni džem s niskim sadržajem šećera
it: Confetture e marmellate con pochi zuccheri
nl: Suikervrije jams

en: Apple jams
bg: Конфитюр от ябълки
de: Apfelmarmeladen
es: Mermeladas y confituras de manzana, Mermeladas de manzana, Confituras de manzana
fr: Confitures de pommes
hr: Džemovi od jabuka
hu: Alma lekvár
it: Confetture di mele, Marmellate di mele
ja: りんごジャム, リンゴジャム
nl: Appeljams
pt: Doces de maçã
sv: Äpplesylter

en: Apricot jams, Apricot Marmalades
bg: Конфитюр от кайсии
da: Abrikossyltetøj
de: Aprikosen Konfitüren, Aprikosenkonfitüren, Aprikosenmarmelade
es: Confituras de albaricoque, Mermeladas de albaricoque
fi: Aprikoosihillot
fr: Confitures d’abricot, confitures aux abricots, confitures à l'abricot, Confiture d'abricot extra, Marmelades d’abricots
hr: Džemovi od marelica
hu: Sárgabarack
it: Confetture di albicocche, Marmellate di albicocche
nl: Abrikozenjams, Abrikozenmarmelades
pl: Dżem morelowy
pt: Doces de damasco, doces de alperce, Doce de damasco
ro: Dulceaţă de caise
sk: Marhuľový džem
sl: Marelični džem
sv: Aprikossylter, Aprikossylt
tr: Kayısı reçeli

en: Assorted jams
es: Surtidos de mermeladas
fr: Confitures assorties, assortiments de confitures, assortiment de confitures
hr: Razni džemovi
it: Confetture e marmellate assortite
nl: Jam-assortimenten

en: Beer jams
fr: confiture de bière
it: Confetture di birra, Marmellate di birra

en: Berry jams
ca: Melmelada de baies
da: Bærsyltetøj
de: Marmeladen aus roten Früchten
es: Mermeladas y confituras de frutas del bosque, Mermeladas de frutas del bosque, Confituras de frutas del bosque, Mermeladas y confituras de frutas rojas, Mermeladas de frutas rojas, Confituras de frutas rojas
fi: marjahillot
fr: Confitures de fruits rouges, confitures de fruits des bois
he: ריבות מפירות יער, ריבות מפרות יער
hr: Džemovi od bobičastog voća
hu: Piros bogyós lekvárok
it: Confetture di frutti di bosco, Marmellate di frutti di bosco
nl: Jams van rode vruchten
pl: Dżemy i konfitury z owoców jagodowych, Dżemy z owoców jagodowych, Konfitury z owoców jagodowych
pt: Doces de frutas vermelhas
ru: Варенье из ягод
sv: Bärsylter
zh: 莓类果酱